District of Columbia statutes.
43-109

Lot owners are voting members of corporation.

At each subsequent election of officers of any such corporation the owner of a lot in said burial ground shall be entitled to 1 vote in the election of officers of the corporation and no more, and shall, by virtue of such membership, be a member of the corporation.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1295, ch. 854, § 665

History

1981 Ed., § 27-109.
1973 Ed., § 27-109.

Prior Codifications